src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_VÄHETÄ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** vähetä:vähe (vähenöy)
+Act:ne INDPRSSG1 ;
+Act:ne INDPRSSG2 ;
+Act:nö INDPRSSG3_FRONT ;
+Act:ne INDPRSPL1_FRONT ;
+Act:ne INDPRSPL2_FRONT ;
+Act: INDPRSPL3_täh ;
+Act:ne INDPRSCONNEG ;
+Act:n INDPRTSG1     ;
+Act:n INDPRTSG2     ;
+Act:n INDPRTSG3     ;
+Act:n INDPRTPL1_FRONT     ;
+Act:n INDPRTPL2_FRONT     ;
+Act: INDPRTPL3_ttih     ;
+Act+Ind+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:%>n%{lnrs%}yt K ;
+Act+Ind+PrfPrc:%>n%{lnrs%}yh K ;
+Act+Ind+PrfPrcPl3:%>tty K ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nnyh ; !!
+Act: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_tty ;
+Act:n CONDPRS_IS_FRONT ;
!+Act:%>d CONDPRSPL3 ;
!+Act:%>du%^WGStem CONDPRT ;
!+Act:%>da CONDPRTPL3_DAnUs ;

LEXICON V_VÄHETÄ-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** vähetä:vähe (vähenöy)
:%{front%} V-VV_06_FRONT ;

!! -itA

LEXICON V_KABLITA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kablita:kabli
! gradation: no
:e%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_KABLITA-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kablita:kabli
! gradation: no
!:e V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_REVITÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** revitä:rebi
! gradation: yes
:e%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%}%^WGStem V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_REVITÄ-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ revitä:rebi
! gradation: yes
!:e V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!:%^WGStem V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_HÄVITÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** hävitä:hävi
! gradation: no
:e%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_HÄVITÄ-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ hävitä:hävi
! gradation: no
!:e V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_KÄITÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** käitä:käge
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT ;

LEXICON V_MERKITÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** merkitä:merki
:%{front%} V-VV_05_MERKITÄ ;
LEXICON V_MAINITA !!≈ * **@CODE@** mainita:maini
:%{back%} V-VV_05_MAINITA ;
!!≈ *  Incorrect forms are generated here

!! -OtA

LEXICON V_KIKOTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kikota:kikko
! gradation: yes
:%>o%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%}%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_KIKOTA-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kikota:kikko
! gradation: yes
!:%>o V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!:%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_HÖPSÖTÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** höpsötä:höpsö
! gradation: no
:ö%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_HÖPSÖTÄ-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ höpsötä:höpsö
! gradation: no
!:ö V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_ARVOTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** arvota:arvo
! gradation: no
:o%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_ARVOTA-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ arvota:arvo
! gradation: no
!:o V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!! -UtA

LEXICON V_BAUHUTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** bauhuta:bauhu
! gradation: no
:u%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_BAUHUTA-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** bauhuta:bauhu
! gradation: no
:u%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_HÖYRYTÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** höyrytä:höyry
! gradation: no
:ö%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_HÖYRYTÄ-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ höyrytä:höyry
! gradation: no
!:ö V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!! ### Verbs ending nnA, llA, CtA
!! The verb has both vowel and consonant stem.

!! two-syllable stem, panna, mennä

LEXICON V_TULLA !!≈ * **@CODE@** tulla:tul
:%{back%} V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr ;

LEXICON V_KUULTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuulta:kuul
:%{back%} V-VV_KUULLA ;

LEXICON V_KUULTA-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuulta:kuul
:%{back%} V-VV_KUULLA ;

LEXICON V_PESTÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** pestä:pes
:%{front%} V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr ;
!: V-VV_03_FRONT ;

LEXICON V_VIERTÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** viertä:vier
:%{front%} V-VV_VIERRÄ ;
!LEXICON V_VIERTÄ-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ viertä:vier
!: V-VV_VIERRÄ ;

LEXICON V_NOSTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** nosta:no
:%{back%} V_NOSTA/XX_01 ;
LEXICON V_NOSTA/XX_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** nosta:no
! no/sta, -uzen, -uzou, -stah
:us V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr_VOWEL-STEM ;
:s V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr_CONSONANT-STEM ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:uzen K ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:uzou K ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:stah K  ;

LEXICON V_JUOSTA_BACK !!≈ * **@CODE@** juosta:juoks
:%{back%} V_JUOSTA_01 ;
LEXICON V_JUOSTA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** juosta:juoks
+Act:%>e INDPRSSG1 ;
+Act:%>e INDPRSSG2 ;
+Act:%>o INDPRSSG3_BACK ;
+Act:%>e INDPRSPL1 ;
+Act:%>e INDPRSPL2 ;
+Act: INDPRSPL3_dah ;
+Act:%>e INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
! MORE WORK NEEDED 2015-11
+Act: INDPRTSG1     ;
+Act: INDPRTSG2     ;
+Act: INDPRTSG3     ;
+Act: INDPRTPL1     ;
+Act: INDPRTPL2     ;
+Act: INDPRTPL3_dih     ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nUh ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_DU ;

+Act:%^VOICE CONDPRS_IS_BACK ;
+Act: CONDPRSPL3_DAs ;
+Act: CONDPRT_nUs ;
+Act: CONDPRTPL3_DAnnUs ;
+Act: POT_N ;
+Act: POTPL3_DAnneh ;
+Act: IMPRT_GA ;
+Act: IMPRTPL3_DAhes ;

:%^VOICEi ACT-PRSPRC_OSTAI ;
: ACT-PRFPRC_nUH ;
: PSS-PRSPRC_DAvU ;
: PSS-PRFPRC_DU ;
:%^VOICEe M-INF ;
+Inf:%>d%{aä%}%^WGStem K ;
+Ger+Temp:%>de%^WGStems K ;

LEXICON V_NÄHTÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** nähtä:nä
:%{front%} V_NÄHTÄ_01 ;
LEXICON V_NÄHTÄ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** nähtä:nä
!!	+TYÄ: V-VV_02_FRONT	 ;
!:e V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:in K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:it K ;
+Act:i INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:immö K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ittö K ;
:h INDPRTPL3_tih ;
+Act:h INDPRTCONNEGPL3_tU ;
+Act:h CONDPRSPL3_tAs ;
: V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;     ! möin

!+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:in K ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:it K ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl:immö K ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ittö K ;
!+Act:ge V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%{front%}göy K ;
+Act:h INDPRTCONNEG_nUh ;
+Act:g CONDPRS_IS  ;
:gi ACT-PRSPRC_OSTAI ;
:ge M-INF        ;

+Act:h CONDPRT_nUs ;
+Act:h CONDPRTPL3_DAnUs ;
+Act:h POT_N ;
+Act:h POTPL3_DAneh ;
+Act:h IMPRT_KA ;
+Act:h IMPRTPL3_tAhes ;
:h PSS-PRSPRC_tAvU ;
:h ACT-PRFPRC_nUH ;
:h PSS-PRFPRC_tU ;

+Act:g  V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  ! möi
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:gi K ;

+Act:h INDPRSPL3_tAh ;
+Inf:htä K ;

:h GER_ten ;
:h GER-TEMP_tes ;
+Act+PrsPrc:gev%{aäuyiØ%} NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY ;

!! polysyllable stem, ommella, kävellä, ulista, pölistä

! Verbs of the Finnish type 3 but not identical
! gradation: yes
